ja: 釣り針の用途: ファイン; ゲートラッチ; ヘアリグ; ヘビーデューティー; ルーピング; 多目的; PVAスティック; スプライシング; ストリンガー; スレッディング; その他
el: Σκοπός της βελόνας ψαρέματος: Λεπτή; Gate latch; Hair rig; Βαρέως τύπου; Για θηλιές; Πολλαπλών χρήσεων; PVA stick; Για μάτισμα (splicing); Stringer; Περάσματος; Άλλο
pt-PT: Finalidade da agulha de pesca: Fina; Fecho de mola; Montagem de cabelo; Trabalhos pesados; Laços; Multiusos; Stick em PVA; Emenda; Agulha de enfiar; Passagem de fio; Outro
sv: Syfte med fiskenålar: Fin; Låsspärr; Hair-rigg; Kraftig; Ögla; Mångsidig; PVA-stick; Skarvning; Stringer; Trädning; Övrigt
da: Formål med fiskenålen: Fin; Låsenål; Hair rig; Heavy duty; Løkker; Multifunktionel; PVA-stick; Splejsning; Stringer; Trådning; Andet
vi: Mục đích của kim câu cá: Mũi nhỏ; Có chốt gài; Cột thẻo tóc (hair rig); Siêu bền; Tạo vòng; Đa năng; Ống PVA; Nối dây; Xỏ mồi; Xỏ dây; Khác
es: Propósito de la aguja de pesca: Fina; Cierre de pestillo; Montaje hair rig; Alta resistencia; Lazo; Multiuso; Palo de PVA; Empalme; Aguja stringer; Enhebrado; Otro
zh-TW: 釣魚穿線針用途: 精細; 帶鎖扣; 髮絲釣組; 重型 / 耐用; 打結; 多用途; PVA 棒; 編接; 串魚線 / 穿線; 穿線; 其他
de: Verwendungszweck der Angelnadel: Fein; Klappöse; Haar-Montage; Heavy Duty; Schlaufen; Mehrzweck; PVA-Stick; Spleißen; Stringer; Einfädeln; Sonstige
pt-BR: Finalidade da agulha de pesca: Fina; Com fecho; Hair rig; Resistente; Laço; Multiuso; Bastão de PVA; Emenda; Stringer; Passagem de fio; Outros
nb: Formål med fiskenålen: Fin; Med lås; Hårrigg; Kraftig; Løkkelaging; Flerbruk; PVA-stick; Spleising; Stringer; Treing; Annet
cs: Účel rybářské jehly: Jemná; S očkem a západkou; Na vlasové návazce; Pro vysoké zatížení; Na tvorbu smyček; Víceúčelová; Na PVA punčochy; Pletací; Navlékací; Provlékací; Jiné
fr: Usage prévu de l’aiguille de pêche: Fine; À chas articulé; Montage au cheveu; Robuste; À boucle; Multi-usage; Stick PVA; Épissure; Chapelet; Enfilage; Autre
ko: 낚시바늘 용도: 미세용; 게이트 래치; 헤어 리그; 헤비 듀티; 루핑; 다용도; PVA 스틱; 스플라이싱; 스트링거; 스레딩; 기타
ro-RO: Scopul acului de pescuit: Subțire; Cu clapetă; Montură cu fir de păr; Regim greu; Realizare bucle; Multifuncțional; Stick PVA; Splicing; Stringer; Trecere pe fir; Altele
nl: Doel visnaald: Fijn; Latch; Hair rig; Heavy duty; Lussen; Multifunctioneel; PVA-stick; Splitsen; Stringer; Rijgen; Overige
th: วัตถุประสงค์ของเข็มตกปลา: ละเอียด; เกตแลตช์; แฮร์ริก; ใช้งานหนัก; ทำห่วง; อเนกประสงค์; แท่ง PVA; ต่อสาย; ร้อยเหยื่อ; ร้อยสาย; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Žvejybos adatos paskirtis: Plona; Su užraktu; Plauko sistemėlėms; Sustiprinta; Kilpoms formuoti; Daugiafunkcė; PVA lazdelėms; Supynimui; Girliandoms („Stringer“); Vėrimui; Kita
pl: Przeznaczenie igły wędkarskiej: Cienka (do delikatnych przynęt); Z zapadką; Do przyponów włosowych; Wzmocniona (heavy duty); Do pętli; Wielofunkcyjna; Do siatek PVA; Do splatania (splicing); Do nici rozpuszczalnych (stringer); Do nawlekania; Inne
sl-SI: Namen ribiške igle: Tanka; Z zapiralom; Lasna montaža; Za težke obremenitve; Izdelava zank; Večnamenska; PVA-palčka; Spajanje; Nizanje; Napeljevanje; Drugo
en: Fishing needle purpose: Fine; Gate latch; Hair rig; Heavy duty; Looping; Multipurpose; PVA stick; Splicing; Stringer; Threading; Other
it: Scopo dell'ago da pesca: Sottile; Con chiusura a linguetta; Hair rig; Resistente; Per asole; Multiuso; Stick in PVA; Per impiombature; Stringer; Per infilare; Altro
tr: Balıkçılık iğnesi kullanım amacı: İnce; Mandallı; Hair rig; Ağır hizmet; Halka yapma; Çok amaçlı; PVA çubuğu; Ekleme; Dizgi; İp geçirme; Diğer
bg-BG: Предназначение на риболовната игла: Фина; С езиче; За косъм; Усилена; За клупове; Многоцелева; За PVA стик; За сплитане; За стрингер; За продяване; Друго
fi: Syöttineulan tarkoitus: Hieno; Porttisalpa; Hiusrigi; Raskas käyttö; Silmukointi; Monikäyttöinen; PVA-tikku; Pleissaus; Stringer; Pujotus; Muu
ru: Назначение рыболовной иглы: Тонкая; С замком; Для волосяной оснастки; Усиленная; Для петель; Универсальная; Для ПВА-стиков; Для сплайсинга; Для стрингеров; Для продевания; Другое
hr-HR: Namjena ribarske igle: Tanka; S vratancima; Za sustav s dlakom; Za teške uvjete; Za izradu petlji; Višenamjenska; Za PVA mrežice; Za uplitanje; Za PVA nit; Za provlačenje; Ostalo
sk-SK: Účel rybárskej ihly: Jemná; So západkou; Vlasová montáž; Odolná; Na slučky; Viacúčelová; PVA stick; Na prepájanie; Na stringery; Navliekacia; Iné
hu: Horgásztű célja: Vékony; Szemes-záras; Hajszálelőkés (hair rig); Erősített; Hurokkészítő; Többcélú; PVA rúd; Fűzőtű; Stringer (fűzőtű); Fűzés; Egyéb
zh-CN: 鱼针用途: 精细; 带锁扣; 钓饵结; 重型; 打结/做环; 多用途; PVA 棒; 拼接; 穿线; 穿线; 其他